Utah statutes.
56-1-29.   Removal or use of first-aid kit except for proper purpose --
Misdemeanor.
Any person or any employee of the railroad company who shall remove, carry
away from its proper place or use any emergency first-aid kit provided for in
this act, except for the purpose of administering first-aid in the event of
injury to any passenger, employee, or other person in any accident whereby
said kit may be made available at once, shall be deemed guilty of a
misdemeanor.
